Wyoming, session 2025, HB0149.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1.

(a) The legislature finds that:

HB0149

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0545
(i) The state seeks to place children in a safe,
loving and supportive home when the state is required to
place a child with an adoptive or foster family;

(ii) There are several adoption and foster care
agencies in this state that assist families with adoption
and foster parent placements of children;

(iii) The adoption and foster care agencies in
Wyoming represent diverse organizations and groups, some of
which are faith-based and some of which are not
faith-based;

(iv) Children in need of adoption and foster
care placement services benefit from having as many
adoption and foster parent agencies available as possible,
because the more agencies that participate in these
services, the greater the likelihood that children will
find permanent placements;

(v) The United States Supreme Court has
recognized the benefits of having more, not fewer, adoption
and foster care providers. "Maximizing the number of foster
HB0149

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0545
families and minimizing liability are important goals, but
the City fails to show that granting [Catholic Social
Services] an exception will put those goals at risk. If
anything, including [Catholic Social Services] in the
program seems likely to increase, not reduce, the number of
available foster parents." Fulton v. City of Philadelphia,
141 S. Ct. 1868, 1881–82 (2021);

(vi) Children and families benefit greatly from
the adoption and foster care services provided by
faith-based and nonfaith-based child placement agencies;

(vii) Faith-based organizations and groups have
a lengthy and distinguished history of providing adoption
and foster care services in Wyoming;

(viii) Private child placement agencies and
persons, including faith-based child placement agencies and
persons, have the right to free exercise of religion under
both the United States and Wyoming Constitutions. Under
well-settled principles of constitutional law, this right
includes the freedom to abstain from conduct that conflicts
with an agency's sincerely held religious beliefs;
HB0149

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0545

(ix) Ensuring that faith-based child placement
agencies can continue to provide adoption and foster care
services will benefit the children and families who receive
those services;

(x) The United States Constitution allows all
adoption and foster care providers to operate according to
their beliefs without fear of unjust government punishment;

(xi) In a unanimous decision, the United States
Supreme Court made clear that state governments violate the
requirements of religious neutrality when they undermine
religious beliefs or practices, stating that government
"fails to act neutrally when it proceeds in a manner
intolerant of religious beliefs or restricts practices
because of their religious nature." Fulton v. City of
Philadelphia, 141 S. Ct. 1868, 1877 (2021);

(xii) "The Constitution forbids laws that
prohibit the free exercise of religion. That guarantee
protects not just the right to be a religious person,
holding beliefs inwardly and secretly; it also protects the
HB0149

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0545
right to act on those beliefs outwardly and publicly."
Espinoza v. Mont. Dep't of Revenue, 591 U.S. 464, 510
(2020) (Gorsuch, J., concurring) (emphases in original);

(xiii) The United States Supreme Court has "long
recognized the importance of protecting religious actions,
not just religious status." Espinoza, 591 U.S. at 511
(Gorsuch, J., concurring). The "First Amendment protects
the 'freedom to act' as well as the 'freedom to believe.'"
Espinoza, 591 U.S. at 511 (Gorsuch, J., concurring)
(quoting Cantwell v. Connecticut, 310 U.S. 296, 303
(1940));

(xiv) The government violates the Free Exercise
Clause whenever it "conditions receipt of an important
benefit upon conduct proscribed by a religious faith, or
where it denies such a benefit because of conduct mandated
by religious belief, thereby putting substantial pressure
on an adherent to modify his behavior to violate his
beliefs." Thomas v. Review Bd. of Ind. Employment Sec.
Div., 450 U.S. 707, 717–18 (1981).

HB0149

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0545
Section 2. W.S. 1-39-124 and 14-1-301 through
14-1-304 are created to read:

1-39-124. Liability; discrimination against adoption
and foster care providers and parents.

A governmental entity is liable for damages resulting from
a violation of W.S. 14-1-301 through 14-1-304 pursuant to
W.S. 14-1-303.

ARTICLE 3
ADOPTION AND FOSTER CARE PROTECTION

14-1-301. Definitions.

(a) As used in this article:

(i) "Adoption or foster care" means any social
service provided to or on behalf of children for adoption
or foster care, including:

(A) Promoting foster parenting;

HB0149

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0545
(B) Providing foster homes, residential
care, group homes or temporary group shelters for children;

(C) Recruiting foster parents;

(D) Placing children in foster homes;

(E) Licensing or certifying foster homes;

(F) Promoting adoption or recruiting
adoptive parents;

(G) Assisting adoptions or supporting
adoptive families;

(H) Performing or assisting home studies;

(J) Assisting kinship guardianships or
kinship caregivers;

(K) Providing family preservation services;

(M) Providing family support services;
HB0149

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0545

(N) Providing temporary family
reunification services.

(ii) "Governmental entity" means the state and
its agencies and political subdivisions, the University of
Wyoming, cities, towns and counties and their agencies,
instrumentalities and institutions;

(iii) "Religious organization" means one (1) or
more of the following:

(A) A house of worship, including churches,
synagogues, shrines, mosques and temples;

(B) A religious group, corporation,
association, school, educational institution, ministry,
order, society or other entity, regardless of whether the
entity is integrated or affiliated with a church or other
house of worship;

HB0149

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0545
(C) An officer, owner, employee, manager,
religious leader, clergy or minister of an entity or
organization described in this paragraph.

(iv) "State benefit program" means any program
administered, controlled or funded by the state or any
other governmental entity that provides cash, payments,
grants, contracts, loans or other in-kind assistance.

14-1-302. Protections for adoption agencies and
foster care providers and adoptive and foster parents;
discrimination prohibited.

(a) No governmental entity shall take any
discriminatory action against a person:

(i) That advertises, provides or facilitates
adoption or foster care, wholly or partially on the basis
that the person has provided or declined to provide any
adoption or foster care service or related service based on
or in a manner consistent with a sincerely held religious
belief;

HB0149

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0545
(ii) To whom the governmental entity grants
custody of a foster or adoptive child, or who seeks the
custody of a foster or adoptive child, wholly or partially
on the basis that the person guides, instructs or raises a
child, or intends to guide, instruct or raise a child,
based on or in a manner consistent with a sincerely held
religious belief. For purposes of this paragraph, a
governmental entity may consider whether a person shares
the same religion or faith tradition as a foster or
adoptive child when considering placement of the child in
order to prioritize placement with a person of the same
religion or faith tradition.

(b) No governmental entity shall take any of the
following discriminatory actions against any person
protected under subsection (a) of this section because of a
sincerely held religious belief:

(i) Alter in any way the tax treatment of, or
cause any additional tax, penalty or payment to be assessed
against, or deny, delay, revoke or otherwise make
unavailable an exemption from taxation;

HB0149

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0545
(ii) Disallow, deny or otherwise make
unavailable a deduction for state taxation purposes of any
charitable contribution made to or by a person protected
under subsection (a) of this section;

(iii) Withhold, reduce, exclude, terminate,
materially alter the terms and conditions of or otherwise
make unavailable or deny any state grant, contract,
subcontract, cooperative agreement, guarantee, loan,
scholarship or other similar benefit;

(iv) Withhold, reduce, exclude, terminate,
adversely alter the terms or conditions of or otherwise
make unavailable or deny any entitlement or benefit under a
state benefit program;

(v) Impose, levy or assess a monetary fine, fee,
penalty, damages award or injunction, unless otherwise
expressly provided by law;

(vi) Withhold, reduce, exclude, terminate,
materially alter the terms or conditions of or otherwise
make unavailable or deny any license, certification,
HB0149

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0545
accreditation, custody award, agreement, diploma, grade,
recognition or other similar benefit, position or status,
unless otherwise expressly provided by law;

(vii) Refuse to hire or promote, force to
resign, fire, demote, sanction, discipline, adversely alter
the terms or conditions of employment or retaliate or take
any other adverse employment action, if the person is
employed or is seeking employment with a governmental
entity.

(c) Except as otherwise provided by state and federal
law, each governmental entity shall consider a person
protected under subsection (a) of this section to be
accredited, licensed or certified as an adoptive parent or
foster care parent if the person would otherwise be
accredited, licensed or certified as an adoptive parent or
foster care parent under state law but for a determination
against the person wholly or partially on the basis that
the person believes, maintains policies and procedures or
acts in accordance with a sincerely held religious belief.

HB0149

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0545
(d) Each governmental entity shall consider any
person for a contract, grant or agreement related to
adoption or foster care if the person otherwise would be
considered but for a determination against the person
wholly or partially on the basis that the person believes,
maintains policies and procedures or acts in accordance
with a sincerely held religious belief.

14-1-303. Remedies; claims; defenses; immunity
waived.

(a) Any person may assert a violation of this article
as a claim against a governmental entity in any judicial or
administrative proceeding, or as a defense in any judicial
or administrative proceeding.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an
action arising from this article may be commenced, and
relief may be granted, without regard to whether the person
commencing the action has sought or exhausted remedies
available under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

HB0149

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0545
(c) Any person who successfully asserts a claim or
defense under this article may recover:

(i) Declaratory relief;

(ii) Injunctive relief;

(iii) Compensatory damages;

(iv) Reasonable attorney fees and costs;

(v) Any other appropriate relief.

(d) For purposes of subsection (c) of this section,
declaratory relief and injunctive relief shall only be
available upon a successful assertion of a defense under
this article.

(e) Any action commenced under this section shall be
brought not later than two (2) years after the date the
person knew or reasonably should have known that a
discriminatory action was taken against a person in
violation of this article.
HB0149

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0545

14-1-304. Applicability.

(a) This article shall be construed in favor of a
broad protection of free exercise of religious beliefs, to
the maximum extent permitted by the constitutions of the
United States and Wyoming.

(b) The protection of free exercise of religious
beliefs afforded by this article are in addition to the
protections provided under federal law, state law and the
constitutions of the United States and Wyoming. Nothing in
this article shall be construed to:

(i) Preempt or repeal any state or local law
that is equally or more protective of the free exercise of
religious beliefs;

(ii) Narrow the meaning or application of any
state or local law protecting the free exercise of
religious beliefs;

HB0149

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0545
(iii) Prevent the state or a governmental entity
from providing, either directly or through a person not
seeking protection under this article, any benefit or
service authorized under state law.

(c) This act shall apply to, and in cases of conflict
shall supersede, any other statute, rule or regulation that
infringes upon the free exercise of religious beliefs and
moral convictions protected by this article, unless a
conflicting statute is expressly made exempt from the
application of this article. This act shall apply to and
supersede any ordinance, rule, regulation, order, opinion,
decision, practice or other exercise of the state's and
each governmental entity's authority that infringes on the
free exercise of religious beliefs protected by this
article.

Section 3. W.S. 1-39-104(a) is amended to read:

1-39-104. Granting immunity from tort liability;
liability on contracts; exceptions.

HB0149

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0545
(a) A governmental entity and its public employees
while acting within the scope of duties are granted
immunity from liability for any tort except as provided by
W.S. 1-39-105 through 1-39-112, and 1-39-122 and 1-39-123
through 1-39-124. Any immunity in actions based on a
contract entered into by a governmental entity is waived
except to the extent provided by the contract if the
contract was within the powers granted to the entity and
was properly executed and except as provided in W.S.
1-39-120(b). The claims procedures of W.S. 1-39-113 apply
to contractual claims against governmental entities.

Section 4. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0149